Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 24 FUELS TAX
§ 63-2424. Gaseous special fuels.

In the case of gaseous special fuels, the commission shall provide by rule the method to be used for converting the measurement of the fuel to the equivalent of gallons for the purpose of applying tax rates. The method provided shall cause the tax rate provided in section 63-2402, Idaho Code, to apply to an amount of gaseous special fuels having energy equal to one (1) gallon of gasoline.

The commission shall use the following measurement for natural gas:

When determining the tax on liquefied natural gas, a “diesel gallon equivalent” is a quantity that weighs six and six hundredths (6.06) pounds; and

When determining the tax on compressed natural gas, a “gasoline gallon equivalent” is one hundred twenty-six and sixty-seven hundredths (126.67) cubic feet of natural gas at sixty (60) degrees Fahrenheit and fourteen and seven-tenths (14.7) pounds per square inch absolute or a quantity of compressed natural gas that weighs five and sixty-six hundredths (5.66) pounds.

As used in this chapter, “gaseous special fuels” means a motor fuel that is a gas at standard pressure and temperature (i.e., at sixty (60) degrees Fahrenheit and fourteen and seven-tenths (14.7) pounds per square inch absolute).

§ 63-2425. Dyed fuel and other untaxed fuel prohibited for use on a highway.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (5) of this section, no person shall operate a motor vehicle on a highway in this state if the fuel supply tanks of the vehicle contain diesel fuel that has been dyed or marked at a refinery or terminal under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 4082 and regulations adopted thereunder or under the clean air act and regulations adopted thereunder or if the tanks contain other motor fuel on which the tax under section 63-2402, Idaho Code, has not been paid.

The following vehicles may use dyed fuel on the highway but are subject to the tax under section 63-2402, Idaho Code, unless exempt under other provisions of this chapter:

State and local government vehicles; and

Any vehicles that may use dyed fuel on the highway under the provisions of 26 U.S.C. 4082 or regulations adopted thereunder.

For the purposes of enforcement of this section, Idaho state police officers or employees of the Idaho transportation department may conduct a visual observation of fuel to detect the presence of dye. If dye is observed, such officers or employees shall take a photograph of the dyed fuel. Such photographs shall be preserved as evidence.

In the event of a change of ownership or other disposal of a motor vehicle authorized to use dyed fuel on the highway pursuant to subsection (2) of this section but that no longer falls within the provisions of that subsection, the motor vehicle’s owner, before selling or disposing of such vehicle, shall remove the dyed fuel from the vehicle’s fuel tanks and certify that such dyed fuel has been removed.

Incidental use or crossing of public roads or highways by vehicles intended primarily for off-highway use, including as provided for in section 49-110(3), Idaho Code, with respect to an implement of husbandry, shall not be considered a violation of this section.

§ 63-2426. [Reserved.]

§ 63-2427. Administration.

The commission shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce reasonable rules and regulations relating to the administration and enforcement of those provisions.

§ 63-2427A. Motor fuel distributor license.

It is unlawful for a person to act as a motor fuel distributor without a motor fuel distributor license. A person required to obtain such license is the first receiver of taxable motor fuel in Idaho. A person is not required to obtain a motor fuel distributor license when the person:

Only purchases motor fuel on which any tax due under this chapter has previously been imposed upon a licensed distributor; or

Only purchases dyed fuel upon which the transfer fee imposed in section 41-4909, Idaho Code, has been imposed upon a licensed distributor; or

Only produces five thousand (5,000) gallons or less of biodiesel in a calendar year for that person’s personal consumption. Any producer who sells or transfers any quantity of biodiesel to any other person is the first receiver of the biodiesel and is required to obtain a motor fuel distributor license.

Application for a license shall be made upon forms furnished and in a manner prescribed by the commission and shall contain information as it deems necessary. An application will not be accepted unless it is accompanied by a bond in the amount required in section 63-2428, Idaho Code. The commission shall not issue a motor fuel distributor license to any person who does not consent to be sued in Idaho district court for purposes of the state enforcing any provision of this chapter.

Upon receipt of the application and bond in proper form the commission shall issue the applicant a license to act as a distributor unless the applicant:

Is a person who formerly held a license under the provisions of this chapter, any predecessor statute, under the laws of any other jurisdiction, or under the laws of the United States which license, prior to the time of filing this application, had been revoked for cause within five (5) years from the date of such application; or

Is a person who has outstanding fuel tax liabilities to or is in violation of the motor fuel laws of this state, any other jurisdiction or the United States government; or

Is a person who has been convicted, under the laws of the United States or any state or jurisdiction or subdivision thereof, of fraud, tax evasion, or a violation of the laws governing the reporting and payment of fees or taxes for petroleum products within five (5) years from the date of making such application; or

Is a person who has been convicted of a felony or been granted a withheld judgment following an adjudication of guilt of a felony within five (5) years from the date of such application; or

Who is not the real party in interest and the real party in interest is a person described in paragraph (a), (b), (c) or (d) of this subsection.

Upon approval of the application, the license shall be valid until it is canceled by the licensee or revoked for cause.

No license shall be transferable.

§ 63-2427B. Licensed gaseous fuels distributors — Reports.

In lieu of the motor fuel distributor license required by section 63-2427A, Idaho Code, the commission may issue a gaseous fuels distributor license to a distributor who applies for the license and who does not deal in fuel, other than gaseous fuels, except fuel which is either:

Motor fuel on which any tax due under this chapter has previously been imposed upon a licensed distributor; or

Dyed fuel upon which the transfer fee imposed in section 41-4909, Idaho Code, has been imposed upon a licensed distributor.

Licensed gaseous fuels distributors shall, not later than the last day of each calendar month or for such other reporting period as the commission may authorize, render to the commission an accurate report of all gaseous fuels that are subject to tax under this chapter during the preceding reporting period. The report shall be made in the manner and on forms required by the commission and shall include such other information as the commission may require for the proper administration of this chapter.

§ 63-2427C. Limited distributor license.

A limited distributor license will be issued to persons only required to remit the fee imposed by chapter 49, title 41, Idaho Code, and not required to obtain a license under section 63-2427A or 63-2427B, Idaho Code. The licensee is a licensed distributor for the purposes of filing reports, paying fees and other actions necessary for the proper administration of the petroleum clean water trust fund act. A limited distributor license will not be valid for any other purpose. No bond shall be required for a limited distributor license.

§ 63-2428. Bonding.

At the time an application for a motor fuel distributor license under section 63-2427A, Idaho Code, is submitted to the commission, the applicant shall file a bond with the commission conditioned upon faithful performance of all of the requirements of this chapter. The total amount of the bond shall be fixed by the commission and shall be equivalent to at least twice the estimated average tax liability for the reporting period for which the applicant will be required to file a distributor’s report under section 63-2406, Idaho Code. The bond required by this section shall in no case be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000). Based on prior years’ experience, the total amount required to be secured by the bond may be increased or reduced by the commission at any time. The bond will be waived if the commission is satisfied that the distributor has the financial responsibility to meet the required bond amount. Financial responsibility may be determined by the commission upon review of all relevant public documents including appropriate county records and records of tax payments to the state of Idaho. The distributor can be required to provide a commercial credit rating, balance sheet, or income statement to demonstrate present financial solvency, i.e. ownership of real and/or personal property, the unencumbered value of which exceeds the bond amount otherwise required. If such financial solvency is established, and if the distributor has been doing business in Idaho as a licensed distributor for five (5) or more consecutive years without a default in the payment of taxes imposed in this chapter, financial responsibility shall be presumed. Any bond given in conjunction with this chapter shall be a continuing instrument, and shall cover the period during which the license in connection with which the bond is given is in effect, unless the surety on the bond is released or discharged by the commission. Any surety on any bond furnished by a licensee shall be discharged and released from any and all liability to the state accruing on the bond after the expiration of thirty (30) days from the date upon which the surety shall have lodged with the commission a written request to be released and discharged. The request shall not operate to relieve, release or discharge the surety from any liability accrued, or which will accrue, before the expiration of the thirty (30) day period. The commission shall promptly, upon receipt of the notice of the request, notify the licensee and require him to furnish a new bond. Unless the licensee files a new bond with the commission in the amount provided in this section before the expiration of the thirty (30) day period, the commission shall immediately cancel the licensee’s license.

In the event that any taxes due under the provisions of this chapter are not paid by a licensed distributor, and the unpaid taxes are assessed by the commission, and after all avenues for appeal of the assessment have been exhausted, the commission may apply the unpaid tax liability against the bond required by this section.

§ 63-2429. Required records.

Every distributor and every special fuels dealer and every person reporting, manufacturing, refining, dealing, transporting or storing motor fuels in this state shall keep records, receipts, invoices and other pertinent records as the commission may require. Records required and all other relevant books and records shall be available for inspection by the commission at all times during regular record keeper’s business hours.

Records required in subsection (1) of this section shall be kept for a period of three (3) years from the date on which the distributor’s report or special fuels dealer’s return to which they relate was required to be filed with the commission.

§ 63-2430. Revocation or cancellation of license. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 38, § 9, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 63-2470.

§ 63-2431. Tax in lieu of all other taxes imposed.

The taxes imposed by this chapter shall be in lieu of all other excise taxes, license fees or property taxes imposed upon motor fuels by this state or any political subdivision of this state.

§ 63-2432. Civil action to prevent doing business without license — Injunction.

If the commission determines that any person is engaged in business as a distributor or special fuels dealer without holding a valid license, it may proceed by injunction or other legal process to prevent the continuance of the business, and an injunction enjoining the continuance of the business by any unlicensed person may be granted without bond by any court or judge authorized by law to grant injunctions.

§ 63-2433. Doing business without a license

Penalties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 38, § 10, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 63-2450.

§ 63-2434. Enforcement provisions.

For the purpose of carrying out its duties to enforce or administer the provisions of this chapter, the commission shall have the powers and duties provided by sections 63-3038, 63-3039, 63-3042 through 63-3066, 63-3068, 63-3071, 63-3074 through 63-3078, and 63-217, Idaho Code, which sections are incorporated by reference herein as though set out verbatim.

§ 63-2435. Taxes are state money. [Repealed.]

§ 63-2436. Reports of importations by carrier — Contents.

The commission may require any railroad or other common carrier, or contract carrier, or any person, other than a licensee, who makes delivery in this state of any motor fuels to report in writing to the commission, not later than the last day of each calendar month, all the deliveries for the preceding calendar month. The commission may require information in the reports to include the place of origin and place of destination of the motor fuels delivered, the names and addresses of consignors and consignees, loading ticket numbers, number of gallons delivered, and any other information the commission may require.

§ 63-2437. Instate pipeline terminal and storage reports.

The commission may require a monthly report from each pipeline terminal located in this state not later than the last day of the next succeeding calendar month. The commission may require information in the report to include the date of withdrawal, bill of lading number, manifest number, or loading ticket number and the origin, consignee, consignor, transportation company, and number of gallons separately indicated of gasoline, aircraft engine fuel and special fuels and any other information as the commission may require.

§ 63-2438. International fuel tax agreement (IFTA) license.

It shall be unlawful for any person to consume special fuels in the operation or propulsion of a motor vehicle over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds maximum gross weight on the highways of this state unless such motor vehicle is:

Licensed under the provisions of the international fuels tax agreement; or

Operating under a temporary permit under section 49-432, Idaho Code; or

Registered solely for operation in this state under section 49-434, Idaho Code, and is not a vehicle proportionally registered under section 49-435, Idaho Code.

The application for an Idaho IFTA license shall be made to the commission upon a form prepared and furnished by the commission and containing such information as the commission deems necessary. Carriers based in other IFTA jurisdictions must apply to their base jurisdiction to obtain an IFTA license.

No IFTA license shall be transferable.

The commission may collect a fee for issuance of the IFTA license and decal, which fee shall not exceed the cost of issuance.

§ 63-2439. Reports and payment by holders of an Idaho international fuel tax agreement (IFTA) license.

Each person issued an Idaho IFTA license as required under section 63-2438, Idaho Code, shall file with the commission in the manner and form prescribed by it, the tax report required by the IFTA. Such report shall contain a declaration by the person making the same, to the effect that the statements contained therein are true and are made under penalties of perjury, which declaration shall have the same force and effect as a verification of the report and shall be in lieu of such verification. The report shall show such information as the commission may reasonably require for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter.

The tax report shall be accompanied by the remittance covering the total tax, penalty and interest due. The tax due shall be calculated by multiplying the tax rate per gallon for each IFTA jurisdiction by the number of taxable gallons of fuel taxable in each IFTA jurisdiction, less any tax already paid upon purchases of fuel in that jurisdiction. The taxable gallons consumed shall be calculated by dividing the taxable miles traveled in each jurisdiction by such motor vehicles by the fleet average miles per gallon of such motor vehicles.

§ 63-2440. Exemptions from international fuel tax agreement license and reports and temporary permits.

In lieu of obtaining an IFTA license, any person operating a motor vehicle over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds maximum gross weight, propelled by special fuels in this state, shall secure a temporary permit under section 49-432, Idaho Code, authorizing the operation of such vehicle in the state. The temporary permit shall be obtained through the Idaho transportation department. The fees shall be those provided by section 49-432, Idaho Code, and the revenues shall be distributed as provided by section 40-701, Idaho Code.

A motor vehicle owned or operated by another state of the United States or an agency or political subdivision thereof shall be exempt from the requirements of sections 63-2438 and 63-2439, Idaho Code, if the state where the vehicle is owned grants a substantially similar exemption to vehicles owned by the state of Idaho, its agencies or political subdivisions.

Recreational vehicles, as defined in section 63-2401, Idaho Code, and buses used exclusively for personal pleasure by an individual shall be exempt from the requirements of sections 63-2438 and 63-2439, Idaho Code. A recreational vehicle used in connection with any business or institutional endeavor shall not qualify for the exemption under this subsection.

§ 63-2441. Penalties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 38, § 11, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§ 63-2460.

§ 63-2442. Exchange of information agreements.

For the purpose of administering the provisions of this chapter, the commission and the Idaho transportation department may enter into such written agreements for the exchange of information or delegation of authority or both as the commission and the department may find necessary to properly implement the letter and intent of the provisions of this chapter.

§ 63-2442A. International fuel tax agreement and other agreements between jurisdictions.

The commission may enter into cooperative agreements with other jurisdictions for exchange of information and auditing of distributors, dealers and users of motor fuels. The commission shall participate in the international fuel tax agreement as required by the intermodal surface transportation efficiency act of 1991, Public Law 102-240, 105 Stat. 1914, including subsequent amendments to that agreement.

Any person operating a motor vehicle over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds maximum gross weight which is (a) based in this state and (b) operated in this state and in any other jurisdiction which is a member of the international fuels tax agreement shall report and pay all fuel use taxes due to any IFTA member jurisdiction, together with any other charges due to any such jurisdiction which are reportable on the IFTA report, in the manner required by IFTA. If the provisions set forth in the international fuel tax agreement are in conflict with any provision of this chapter, the agreement provisions shall prevail. An agreement, arrangement, declaration or amendment thereto is not effective until stated, in writing, and filed with the commission.

An agreement may provide for determining the base jurisdiction for users, users records requirements, audit procedures, exchange of information, persons eligible for tax licensing, defining qualified motor vehicles, determining if bonding is required, specifying reporting requirements and periods including defining uniform penalty and interest rates for late reporting, determining methods for collecting and forwarding of motor fuels taxes, penalties or interest to another jurisdiction, and other provisions as will facilitate the administration of the agreement.

The commission may, as required by the terms of an agreement, forward to officers of another jurisdiction any information in the commission’s possession relative to the manufacture, receipts, sale, use, transportation, or shipment of motor fuels by any person. The commission may disclose to officers of another jurisdiction, the location of officers, motor vehicles, and other real and personal property of users of motor fuels.

An agreement may provide for each jurisdiction to audit the records of persons based in the jurisdiction, to determine if the motor fuels taxes due each jurisdiction are properly reported and paid. Each jurisdiction shall forward the findings of the audits performed on persons based in the jurisdiction, to each jurisdiction in which the person has taxable use of motor fuels. For persons not based in this state and who have taxable use of motor fuels in Idaho, the commission may serve the audit findings received from another jurisdiction, in the form of an assessment, on the person as though an audit was conducted by the commission.

The commission may enter into additional cooperative agreements with other jurisdictions for mutual enforcement of taxes on gasoline and special fuels not subject to collection pursuant to the international fuel tax agreement. Such agreements may provide for collection and enforcement of the motor fuels taxes of all signatory jurisdictions pursuant to the law, rules, and regulations of the jurisdiction in which a person liable for such taxes maintains his principal place of business. An agreement may provide for any or all of the following: determining the base jurisdiction of persons liable for taxes, records requirements, audit procedures, exchange of information, persons eligible for tax licensing, determining if bonding is required, specifying reporting requirements and periods including defining uniform penalty and interest rates for late reporting, determining methods for collecting and forwarding of motor fuels taxes and penalties to another jurisdiction, and other provisions as will facilitate the administration of the agreement.

Any agreement entered into pursuant to this section does not preclude the commission from auditing the records of any person covered by the provisions of this chapter.

The legal remedies for any person served with an order or assessment under this section are as prescribed in this chapter.

If the commission enters into any agreement under the authority of this section, and the provisions set forth in the agreement are in conflict with any rules promulgated by the commission, the agreement provisions prevail.

§ 63-2443. Violations and penalties. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 38, § 12, effective July 1, 2015. For present comparable provisions, see§§ 63-2450 and 63-2455.

§ 63-2444. Effect of tribal agreements.

Taxes imposed by this chapter shall not apply to motor fuel that is the subject of an agreement authorized by section 67-4002, Idaho Code, to the extent provided by the agreement, but only if the agreement is signed by the governor and appropriate representative of a tribe before December 1, 2007.

§ 63-2445 — 63-2449. [Reserved.]

It is unlawful for any person in the state of Idaho to:

Refuse or knowingly and intentionally fail to make and file any statement required by this chapter in the manner or within the time required;

Fail to pay any tax due or any fee required by this chapter or any related penalties or interest;

Knowingly make any false statement or conceal any material fact in any record, return or affidavit provided for in this chapter with intent to evade or to aid in the evasion of the tax imposed by this chapter;

Conduct any activities requiring a license under this chapter without an active license;

Fail to keep and maintain the books and records required by this chapter;

Use dyed or untaxed fuel in a manner prohibited by this chapter;

Violate any other provision of this chapter.

It is unlawful to purchase, receive or accept any untaxed motor fuel unless authorized by this chapter.

It is unlawful to sell or transfer any untaxed motor fuel unless authorized by this chapter.

§ 63-2451 — 63-2454. [Reserved.]

It is unlawful for any person to operate a motor vehicle or consume any motor fuel in the propulsion of a motor vehicle over twenty-six thousand (26,000) pounds maximum gross weight on the highways of this state, except as provided in section 63-2438, Idaho Code, unless:

Such person is exempt from such requirement under section 63-2440, Idaho Code, or any other provision of state or federal law; or

In the case of vehicles using a gaseous special fuel, such person has complied with section 63-2424, Idaho Code.

It is unlawful to display any international fuels [fuel] tax agreement (IFTA) cab card or decal or temporary permit that:

Is fictitious or counterfeit; or

Is owned by a person other than the owner, operator or lessee of the vehicle on which it is displayed.

§ 63-2456 — 63-2459. [Reserved.]

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or who violates any provision of Idaho law relating to the assessment and collection of any unpaid tax or fee associated with this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor, unless the violation is declared a felony by any other law of this state. Any person so convicted of a misdemeanor shall be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). Each day that an unlicensed person engages in the activities of a licensed distributor constitutes a separate violation.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, any person operating a vehicle licensed or required to be licensed on a highway in this state with diesel fuel in violation of section 63-2425, Idaho Code, will be subject to the following:
(2)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (1) of this section, any person operating a vehicle licensed or required to be licensed on a highway in this state with diesel fuel in violation of section 63-2425, Idaho Code, will be subject to the following:

Upon the first violation, a civil penalty in the amount of two hundred fifty dollars ($250);

Upon the second violation, a civil penalty in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500); and

Upon the third or subsequent violation, a civil penalty in the amount of one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each such violation.

Except for the penalties set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection, no additional fines or penalties shall be imposed.

The commission may assess the penalties set forth in subsection (2) of this section as deficiencies in tax pursuant to sections 63-2434 and 63-3045, Idaho Code.

Penalties are cumulative and each violation of the provisions of this chapter is subject to a separate penalty. The penalties provided for in this section shall be in addition to any other penalty imposed by any other provision of Idaho law.

§ 63-2461 — 63-2469. [Reserved.]

A licensee may cancel his license at any time without prejudice, unless the commission has issued a notice of revocation letter to the licensee. If the licensee cancels his license after receiving a notice of revocation, then the cancellation will be treated as a revocation.

All licenses issued under this chapter may be held only by persons actively engaged in activities requiring a license under this chapter. Any person not so engaged shall surrender his license to the commission for cancellation. A person is actively engaged in activities requiring a license under this chapter when such person is:

A distributor:

Purchasing, selling or otherwise transferring motor fuel or other petroleum products or gaseous fuel decals; or

Reporting receipts, disbursements or other transactions subject to the motor fuel tax, transfer fee or gaseous fuel decals;

An international fuel tax agreement (IFTA) licensee accruing reportable distance and fuel use in any IFTA jurisdiction. The IFTA licensee is not actively engaged in these activities when the requirements for cancellation or denial of renewal are met according to the IFTA articles of agreement, article III, section R345, license renewal (revised July 2013).

A license authorized under this chapter may be denied, revoked or suspended when:

The licensee or applicant fails to comply with the motor fuels laws of this state or any other jurisdiction; or

The licensee does not maintain any required bond; or

The licensee is not actively engaged in the activities identified in subsection (2) of this section for twelve (12) consecutive months.

An IFTA licensee may appeal the denial, cancellation or revocation of an IFTA license following the procedure in the IFTA articles of agreement, article XIV (revised July 2013). The decision of the state tax commission is final and must be issued pursuant to section 63-3045B, Idaho Code, using a thirty (30) day appeal period.

When the state tax commission decides to deny, cancel or revoke a distributor license, it shall immediately notify the person of that decision at the person’s last known address. The notice must be accompanied by an explanation of the specific reason for the decision and the right to appeal the decision. Within sixty-three (63) days after the notice is mailed, the person may file a protest in writing requesting a review of the decision. The appeal must contain legal or factual reasons why the person disagrees with the decision. The person may not make any proceedings at court or other action until the appeal rights relating to the decision have become final.

The decision of the state tax commission is final and must be issued pursuant to section 63-3045B, Idaho Code.

The distributor may only appeal the denial of a properly completed application. When any of the required information is not provided, the state tax commission may consider the application incomplete and request additional information, return the application or deny the application.

A person will not be issued a distributor license after one has previously been revoked, unless the state tax commission is satisfied that the former holder of the license will comply with all the requirements of this chapter and correct any other violations of this chapter upon which the revocation was based. All bonding requirements for the reinstated licensee must be met. A bond waiver may not be requested for five (5) years after the reinstatement of the license. A reinstated distributor’s bond is not subject to the maximum bonding limits in section 63-2428, Idaho Code, but may not exceed the estimated tax liability for six (6) months.

When a license is revoked within one (1) year of a previous revocation, there is no right to appeal the second revocation.

§ 63-2450. Violations in general.

§ 63-2455. Specific violations.

§ 63-2460. Penalties.

§ 63-2470. Enforcement of licensing provisions.